Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Article 4. Amendment of Articles

§§ 191-195.
Repealed.
1971, No. 237 (Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 196.
Power of historical corporations to amend articles.

A corporation, not organized for profit, existing either by special act under the general law, formed for the purpose of erecting and maintaining monuments for the commemoration of historical events, or for the purpose of caring for and maintaining an historical monument owned by the State or located on its land, may, by vote of a majority of its members, amend its charter or articles of association so as to include therein the following powers:

to own, establish, manage, and maintain a museum for the preservation of historical objects;

to maintain and preserve other historical monuments and markers;

to provide or remove limitations as to the number of its members; and

to provide for the payment of membership dues and for different classes of memberships with varying rates of dues.

When such amendment is adopted, a certificate thereof shall be sent to the Secretary of State, executed by the president and clerk, or by a majority of the directors or trustees. The Secretary shall, without fee, record the same if it conforms generally to provisions of this chapter.